Alabama, session 2026rs, HB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
54 Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
55 following terms have the following meanings:
56 (1) COVERED MINOR. Any covered user who is younger than
Page 2

(1) COVERED MINOR. Any covered user who is younger than
HB173 INTRODUCED
57 18 years of age.
58 (2) COVERED OPERATOR. Any operator who operates or
59 provides a covered platform. This does not include the federal
60 government or any state or local government or state or local
61 subdivision thereof.
62 (3) COVERED PLATFORM. Any platform that, as a
63 significant part of the services offered, recommends, selects,
64 or prioritizes for display, either concurrently or
65 sequentially, media items generated or shared on a platform by
66 users of the platform. The term does not include any platform
67 that primarily facilitates the sale of goods or is used by and
68 under the direction of an educational entity, including a
69 learning management system or a student engagement program.
70 (4) COVERED USER. Any user of a covered platform in
71 this state who is not acting as the covered operator, or as an
72 agent or affiliate of the covered operator, of the covered
73 platform.
74 (5) MEDIA ITEM. Any text, image, or video.
75 (6) OPERATOR. Any individual, corporation, limited
76 liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited
77 liability partnership, association, joint stock company,
78 unincorporated organization, or other legal entity that
79 operates or provides a platform.
80 (7) PLATFORM. Any Internet website, online service,
81 online application, mobile application, or social media
82 platform, or any portion thereof.
83 (b)(1) No covered operator of a covered platform shall
84 allow a covered user to access any portion of the covered
Page 3

allow a covered user to access any portion of the covered
HB173 INTRODUCED
85 platform that recommends, selects, or prioritizes for display,
86 either concurrently or sequentially, media items generated or
87 shared by users of the covered platform if the recommendation,
88 selection, or prioritization is based, in whole or in part, on
89 any information associated with the covered user or the
90 covered user's device, unless any of the following occur:
91 a.1. The covered operator has used commercially
92 reasonable and technically feasible methods to determine that
93 the covered user is not a covered minor; or
94 2. If the covered user is a covered minor, the covered
95 operator has obtained verifiable consent from the covered
96 minor's parent or legal guardian to recommend, select, or
97 prioritize media items for such covered minor in the manner
98 prescribed by this section.
99 b. The recommendation, selection, or prioritization is
100 based on information that is not persistently associated with
101 the covered user or the covered user's device and does not
102 concern the covered user's previous interactions with media
103 items generated or shared by other users of the covered
104 platform.
105 c. The recommendation, selection, or prioritization is
106 based on privacy or accessibility settings selected by the
107 covered user or technical information concerning the covered
108 user's device.
109 d. The covered user has expressly and unambiguously
110 requested that any specific media item, media items from a
111 specific author, creator, or poster to whom the covered user
112 has subscribed, or media items shared by users to a specific
Page 4

has subscribed, or media items shared by users to a specific
HB173 INTRODUCED
113 page or group to which the covered user has subscribed be
114 displayed, blocked, prioritized, or deprioritized.
115 e. The recommended, selected, or prioritized media item
116 is a direct and private communication.
117 f. The media item is recommended, selected, or
118 prioritized exclusively in response to a specific search
119 inquiry made by the covered user.
120 g. The media item is recommended, selected, or
121 prioritized for display exclusively because the media item
122 immediately follows any other media item in a preexisting
123 sequence and is from the same author, creator, poster, or
124 source.
125 h. The recommendation, selection, or prioritization is
126 necessary to comply with any other provision of this section.
127 (2) A covered operator shall treat a covered user as a
128 covered minor if the covered operator obtains actual knowledge
129 that the covered user is a covered minor. A covered operator
130 that has used commercially reasonable and technically feasible
131 methods to determine a covered user's age and cannot determine
132 whether the covered user is a covered minor shall presume that
133 such covered user is not a covered minor for the purposes of
134 this subsection.
135 (3)a. Information collected for the purpose of
136 determining a covered user's age under this subsection shall
137 not be used for any other purpose, and such information shall
138 be deleted immediately after an attempt is made to determine
139 the covered user's age unless use or retention is necessary to
140 comply with any federal law or regulation or any other law or
Page 5

comply with any federal law or regulation or any other law or
HB173 INTRODUCED
141 regulation of this state.
142 b. Information collected for the purpose of obtaining
143 verifiable consent from a covered minor's parent or legal
144 guardian shall not be used for any other purpose, and the
145 information shall be deleted immediately after an attempt is
146 made to determine the covered user's age unless use or
147 retention is necessary to comply with any federal law or
148 regulation or any other law or regulation of this state.
149 (4) No covered operator shall withhold or degrade, or
150 reduce the quality or increase the price of, any product,
151 service, or feature due to the prohibition against
152 recommending, selecting, or prioritizing media items in the
153 manner set forth in subdivision (b)(1), unless the
154 withholding, degradation, reduction, or increase is necessary
155 for the covered operator to comply with the provisions of this
156 subsection.
157 (5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
158 prohibit any covered operator from taking any action to
159 restrict access to, or the availability of, any media item
160 that the covered operator in good faith considers to be
161 obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy, excessively violent,
162 harassing, or otherwise objectionable, regardless of whether
163 such media item is protected under the Constitution of Alabama
164 of 2022, or the Constitution of the United States.
165 (c)(1) No covered operator shall send any notification
166 to a covered minor concerning any recommendation, selection,
167 or prioritization made in the manner set forth in subdivision
168 (b)(1) unless:
Page 6

(b)(1) unless:
HB173 INTRODUCED
169 a. The notification is sent to the covered minor during
170 the hours between 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. Central Standard
171 Time; or
172 b. The covered operator has obtained verifiable consent
173 from the covered minor's parent or legal guardian to send
174 notifications to the covered minor outside of the time frame
175 set forth in paragraph a.
176 (2) Unless otherwise required by a covered minor's
177 verified parent or legal guardian, covered operators shall do
178 all of the following as a default setting for the covered
179 operator's covered platform:
180 a. Prevent the covered minor from accessing or
181 receiving any notification described in subdivision (c)(1)
182 outside of the time frame set forth in paragraph (c)(1)a.
183 b. Limit the covered minor's access to any portion of
184 the covered operator's covered platform which recommends,
185 selects, or prioritizes media items in the manner set forth in
186 subdivision (b)(1) to a maximum period of one hour per day.
187 c. Set the covered minor's covered platform account to
188 a mode that exclusively allows users to whom the covered minor
189 is connected to view or respond to content posted by the
190 covered minor.
191 (3) Covered operators shall also establish and maintain
192 a mechanism by which a covered minor's verified parent or
193 legal guardian may require the covered operator to do the
194 following:
195 a. Prevent the covered minor from accessing or
196 receiving any notification described in subdivision (1)
Page 7

receiving any notification described in subdivision (1)
HB173 INTRODUCED
197 outside of a time frame specified by the parent or legal
198 guardian.
199 b. Limit the covered minor's access to any portion of
200 such covered operator's covered platform that recommends,
201 selects, or prioritizes media items in the manner set forth in
202 subdivision (b)(1) to a maximum daily period specified by the
203 parent or legal guardian.
204 c. Set the covered minor's covered platform account to
205 a mode that exclusively allows users to whom the covered minor
206 is connected to view or respond to content posted by the
207 covered minor.
208 (d) Not later than March 1, 2028, and annually
209 thereafter, each covered operator shall publicly disclose, in
210 a form and manner specified by the Attorney General, all of
211 the following information for the preceding calendar year:
212 (1) The total number of covered users who used the
213 covered operator's covered platform during the year.
214 (2) The portion of the total number of covered users
215 who used the covered operator's covered platform during the
216 year for whom the covered operator obtained verifiable consent
217 from a parent or legal guardian.
218 (3) The portion of the total number of covered users
219 who used the covered operator's covered platform for whom the
220 default settings set forth in subdivision (c)(2) were enabled,
221 and the portion of the total number of covered users for whom
222 such default settings were not enabled.
223 (4) The average amount of time per day that covered
224 users used the covered operator's covered platform, broken
Page 8

users used the covered operator's covered platform, broken
HB173 INTRODUCED
225 down by user age and hour of day.
226 (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do
227 any of the following:
228 (1) Require a covered operator to provide a covered
229 minor's parent or legal guardian with access to, or control
230 over, the covered minor's covered platform account or any data
231 associated therewith, unless provision of such access or
232 control is specifically required by this section.
233 (2) Impose liability for any commercial activity or
234 action by a covered operator subject to 15 U.S.C. § 6501 which
235 is inconsistent with the manner in which the commercial
236 activity or action is treated under 15 U.S.C. § 6502.
237 (f) A violation of this section shall be deemed a
238 violation of the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, pursuant to
239 Chapter 19 of Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975.
240 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
241 1, 2026.
Page 9